Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 1. Powers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks §§ 4 to 7.

12 C.J.S. Building and Loan Associations §§ 112 to 131.

§ 13-7-101.
Generally.

Except as otherwise provided any association shall have the powers provided for in the general laws of this state relating to the creation and regulation of private corporations and in addition thereto shall have power, subject to the terms and conditions contained in the articles of incorporation and bylaws to:

Issue stock to its members, to assess and collect from its members reasonable membership fees, withdrawal fees, dues, premiums and fines;

Permit its members to withdraw any or all of their stock deposits upon equitable terms;

Hold and convey such property as is necessary for its accommodation and the transaction of its business, mortgaged in good faith by way of security for debts duly contracted, conveyed to it in satisfaction of debts previously contracted in the course of its dealings, purchased at sales under judgments, decrees or mortgages held by it, or purchased to secure debts due to it;

Make loans to its members upon ample real estate or personal property security, unencumbered except by prior loans from the association, or upon the stock of the association to the extent of its withdrawal value;

Make annual or semiannual distributions of its earnings; and

Do all other things that may be necessary to effect its purposes and conduct its authorized business.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 95, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 17-203; C.S. 1945, § 36-203; W.S. 1957, § 13-245; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to general powers of a bank, see §

13-2-101

.

As to rate of interest when no agreements or provisions exist thereto, see § 40-14-106(e).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of officer of building and loan association to endorse and transfer commercial paper, 37 ALR2d 453.

§ 13-7-102.
Organization of savings and loan associations.

It is the purpose of this section to authorize the organization and operation of state savings and loan associations according to the laws of the state of Wyoming which have the same powers and are subject to the restrictions provided for by the laws of the United States and the rules, regulations and requirements of the appropriate federal banking regulatory agency.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 3.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 108, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 36-501; Laws 1955, ch. 105, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 13-275; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, §§ 1, 3; 2015 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “appropriate federal banking regulatory agency” for “office of thrift supervision and insurance of the shares and deposits of the associations by the federal deposit insurance corporation.”

Applied

in

Wyoming Trust & Mgt. v. Bonham, 694 P.2d 106,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 430

(Wyo. 1985).

§ 13-7-103.
Reports; examinations; membership in federal home loan bank.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 68 § 2.

A state savings and loan association may do all things necessary to obtain and to continue membership in the federal home loan bank and to obtain advances from it.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 108, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 36-502; W.S. 1957, § 13-276; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2015 ch. 68, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, repealed former (a), which read: “Any state savings and loan association may furnish to the office of thrift supervision reports of examinations of the association made by the state banking commissioner and may consent to an examination to be made by the office of thrift supervision or the federal deposit insurance corporation.”

§ 13-7-104.
Real estate and personal property.

Except as provided in W.S.

13-7-102

, any association may acquire, hold, encumber and convey real estate and personal property necessary for the transaction of its business or necessary to enforce or to protect its securities but it shall not otherwise acquire or deal in real estate. No association shall use more than ten percent (10%) of its assets at any time in acquiring real estate for its business location.

All real estate, except that used for its business location, shall be entered on the books as other real estate at not more than acquisition cost or appraised fair market value, whichever is less, and shall be sold within five (5) years after title to the property is acquired except that the association may:

Hold real estate, other than agricultural real estate, for a period not to exceed ten (10) years from the date of acquisition if the association charges off the real estate at a rate not less than that required to annually amortize the balance over fifteen (15) years or less;

Hold agricultural real estate for more than five (5) years after the date of acquisition only if a written waiver is granted by the state banking commissioner. A waiver may be granted under this paragraph for not more than one (1) year at a time and not more than three (3) times.

No exchange of real estate shall be made by any association unless authorized by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of its directors.

Any appraisal required under subsection (b) of this section shall be conducted by a qualified appraiser who is not an officer or director of the association and whose reports are acceptable to the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 17-111; C.S. 1945, § 36-112; W.S. 1957, § 13-225; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to acquisition of real estate by bank, see §

13-3-201

.